Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 8 Nonsuit and Discontinuance

9-8-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 247; G.L. 1909, ch. 283, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 333, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 523, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-8-1

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 18; Repealed by P.L. 1979, ch. 373, § 2. For related provision on dismissal for lack of prosecution, see §

9-8-3

.

9-8-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 351; G.L. 1909, ch. 291, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 341, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 523, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-8-2

; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 20, effective January 10, 1966. For procedure regulating voluntary dismissal of actions in the superior court, see Super. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 41(a). For procedure in the district court, see Dist. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 41(a).

9-8-3.
Dismissal for lack of prosecution.

The supreme court, the superior court, the family court, the district court, or the traffic tribunal, may, at any time, in its discretion, dismiss actions at law and other proceedings for lack of prosecution that have been pending for five (5) years or more, after notice and opportunity for hearing.

Notice that an action or proceeding will be in order for dismissal on a day certain shall be given by the moving party (or by the clerk if upon the court’s own motion) by mailing written notice to the attorney of record, or if there is no attorney of record or the attorney is deceased, then to the party if his or her address appears in the papers of the case. In the event there is no attorney of record, or he or she is deceased, and the address of the party is unknown, notice may be given by insertion of a newspaper advertisement published in a daily newspaper that has circulation in the county or district where the action was instituted, at least once. A certificate of the notice given shall be placed in the papers by the clerk.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 373, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 71, § 1.

Particular Court.

In neither Rule 41(b) of the Superior Court Rules of Civil Procedure nor this section is there any indication that the court may consider only the time during which a case has been pending in that particular court. The language simply allows the justice, in his discretion, to dismiss for lack of prosecution an action that has been pending for five years. Finney Outdoor Advertising Co. v. Cordeiro, 485 A.2d 910,

1984 R.I. LEXIS 650

(R.I. 1984).

9-8-4.
Dismissal on motion of court — Notice — Hearing.

Actions at law, and such other proceedings as the court may order, which have been pending more than ten (10) years on July 10, 1982, may be dismissed for lack of prosecution by the court on its own motion, as directed by the chief justice of the supreme court as to that court, by the presiding justice of the superior court as to that court, and by the respective chief judges of the district and family courts as to those courts. Notice that the dockets are thus to be cleared of inactive cases and the time and place of hearing upon the court’s motion shall be given by the clerk of the court in a public newspaper circulated in the county or district in which the actions are pending by two (2) publications at least one month before the date of hearing. Any attorney, or party not represented by an attorney, may appear at the time of the hearing to be heard on any such dismissals and the court in its discretion may dismiss the case or stay its dismissal for a period to be fixed by the court, and such period may also be extended.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 125, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 135, § 1.

9-8-5.
Annual action by court.

Thereafter, during the first week in February in each year, or as soon as thereafter is practicable, all actions at law, and other proceedings designated by the respective courts, deemed by the court to be inactive and then pending in the supreme court, the superior court, the family court, the district court, or the traffic tribunal, for five (5) years or more, may be dismissed for lack of prosecution, without costs. Entries of such dismissals shall be made as of course by the clerk, upon order of the chief justice, presiding justice, chief judges, or chief magistrate, of the respective courts, after notice has been duly given of the date upon which the cases will stand dismissed. The notice shall be given once a week for two (2) successive weeks at least three (3) weeks before the date in a newspaper having general circulation in the county or district where the action is pending.

Upon the date any party desiring to be heard in opposition to dismissal of a case in which he or she appears may appear before the respective court (in the superior court before the presiding justice) and be heard thereon, and the court may in its discretion dismiss or stay dismissal of the case for such period as it may fix. Extensions of the period may also be granted. Any adversary party shall not be thereby prevented from making a special motion for dismissal within the period so fixed or extended.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 125, § 3; P.L. 1979, ch. 373, § 3; P.L. 1982, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 71, § 1.

9-8-6.
Reinstatement.

Any case dismissed under §§

9-8-3

—

9-8-5

, may be reinstated by the court with or without terms upon motion within one year from dismissal, if the court deems it proper to prevent injustice.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 125, § 4; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 19.